Maryland, session 2025, HB0739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE COMMISSION
MAY NOT APPROVE A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR
A SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION UNLESS EACH COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION WHERE ANY PORTION OF THE GENERATING STATION IS PROPOSED
TO BE LOCATED HAS GIVEN WRITTEN APPROVAL FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE
GENERATING STATION TO THE COMMISSION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0739*

HOUSE BILL 739
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.